Utah statutes.
53A-12-102.   State policy on student fees, deposits, or other charges.

(1)  A fee, deposit, or other charge may not be made, or any expenditure required of a student or the student's parent or guardian, as a condition for student participation in an activity, class, or program provided, sponsored, or supported by or through a public school or school district, unless authorized by the local school board or charter school governing board under rules adopted by the State Board of Education.

(2) (a)  A fee, deposit, charge, or expenditure may not be required for elementary school activities which are part of the regular school day or for supplies used during the regular school day.

(b)  An elementary school or elementary school teacher may compile and provide to a student's parent or guardian a suggested list of supplies for use during the regular school day so that a parent or guardian may furnish on a voluntary basis those supplies for student use.

(c)  A list provided to a student's parent or guardian pursuant to Subsection (2)(b) must include and be preceded by the following language:

"NOTICE: THE ITEMS ON THIS LIST WILL BE USED DURING THE REGULAR SCHOOL DAY.  THEY MAY BE BROUGHT FROM HOME ON A VOLUNTARY BASIS, OTHERWISE, THEY WILL BE FURNISHED BY THE SCHOOL."

